apertium-es-ca.es.dix
    <pardef n="r/odar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaríamos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaría</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaríais</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odarías</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odarían</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaría</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaremos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaré</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaréis</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odarás</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odarán</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odará</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odáremos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odare</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odareis</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odares</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odaren</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odare</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odando</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odándo</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odamos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odé</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odasteis</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaste</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaron</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odó</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odemos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odémo</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odémos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odad</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oda</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odad</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odá</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odád</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueda</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéda</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueden</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéden</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uede</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéde</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odar</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odar</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odár</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odábamos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaba</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odabais</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odabas</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaban</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odaba</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odáramos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odásemos</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odara</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odase</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odarais</l>
          <r>odar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odaseis</l>

    <e lm="rodar">
      <i>r</i>
      <par n="r/odar__vblex"/>
    </e>
